da: Mundstykketype til basmundharmonika: Dobbelt mundstykke; Modulært/udskifteligt mundstykke; Enkelt mundstykke; Andet
ro-RO: Stilul muștiucului muzicuței bas: Muștiuc dublu; Muștiuc modular/înlocuibil; Muștiuc simplu; Altele
vi: Kiểu ống ngậm kèn harmonica bass: Ống ngậm kép; Ống ngậm mô-đun/có thể thay thế; Ống ngậm đơn; Khác
hr-HR: Stil usnika za bas usnu harmoniku: Dvostruki usnik; Modularni/zamjenski usnik; Jednostruki usnik; Ostalo
lt-LT: Bosinės armonikėlės kandiklio tipas: Dvigubas kandiklis; Modulinis / keičiamas kandiklis; Viengubas kandiklis; Kita
zh-TW: 低音口琴吹嘴樣式: 雙吹嘴; 模組化/可替換吹嘴; 單吹嘴; 其他
it: Bocchino per armonica basso: Bocchino doppio; Bocchino modulare/sostituibile; Bocchino singolo; Altro
zh-CN: 低音口琴吹嘴样式: 双吹嘴; 模块化/可更换吹嘴; 单吹嘴; 其他
de: Mundstückstil der Bassharmonika: Doppelmundstück; Modulares/austauschbares Mundstück; Einzelmundstück; Sonstige
pt-PT: Estilo de bocal para harmónica baixo: Bocal duplo; Bocal modular/substituível; Bocal simples; Outro
bg-BG: Стил на мундщука на бас хармониката: Двоен мундщук; Модулен/сменяем мундщук; Единичен мундщук; Друго
hu: Basszusharmonika fúvókájának stílusa: Dupla fúvóka; Moduláris/cserélhető fúvóka; Szimpla fúvóka; Egyéb
fr: Style d’embouchure d’harmonica basse: Embout double; Embout modulaire/remplaçable; Embout simple; Autre
nb: Munnstykkestil for bassharmonika: Dobbelt munnstykke; Modulært/utskiftbart munnstykke; Enkelt munnstykke; Annet
sl-SI: Stil ustnika za basovske orglice: Dvojni ustnik; Modularni/zamenljivi ustnik; Enojni ustnik; Drugo
es: Estilo de boquilla de la armónica de bajo: Boquilla doble; Boquilla modular/reemplazable; Boquilla simple; Otro
el: Στυλ επιστομίου μπάσου φυσαρμόνικας: Διπλό επιστόμιο; Αρθρωτό / αντικαταστάσιμο επιστόμιο; Μονό επιστόμιο; Άλλο
pl: Styl ustnika harmonijki basowej: Podwójny ustnik; Ustnik modułowy/wymienny; Pojedynczy ustnik; Inny
th: รูปแบบปากเป่าฮาร์โมนิกาเบส: ปากเป่าคู่; ปากเป่าแบบถอดประกอบ/เปลี่ยนได้; ปากเป่าเดี่ยว; อื่นๆ
nl: Basharmonica mondstuk stijl: Dubbel mondstuk; Modulair/vervangbaar mondstuk; Enkel mondstuk; Overig
sk-SK: Štýl náustku pre basovú harmoniku: Dvojitý náustok; Modulárny/vymeniteľný náustok; Jeden náustok; Iný
sv: Utformning av basmunspelets munstycke: Dubbelt munstycke; Modulärt/utbytbart munstycke; Enkelt munstycke; Övrigt
fi: Bassohuuliharpun suukappaleen malli: Kaksoissuutin; Modulaarinen/vaihdettava suutin; Yksittäinen suutin; Muu
ja: ベースハーモニカマウスピーススタイル: ダブルマウスピース; モジュラー/交換可能マウスピース; シングルマウスピース; その他
ru: Тип мундштука бас-гармоники: Двойной мундштук; Модульный / сменный мундштук; Одинарный мундштук; Другое
ko: 베이스 하모니카 마우스피스 스타일: 더블 마우스피스; 모듈형/교체형 마우스피스; 싱글 마우스피스; 기타
tr: Bas armonika ağızlık tipi: Çift ağızlık; Modüler/değiştirilebilir ağızlık; Tek ağızlık; Diğer
en: Bass harmonica mouthpiece style: Double mouthpiece; Modular/replaceable mouthpiece; Single mouthpiece; Other
cs: Provedení nátrubku basové foukací harmoniky: Dvojitý náustek; Modulární/vyměnitelný náustek; Jednoduchý náustek; Jiné
pt-BR: Estilo de bocal para gaita de baixo/harmônica: Bocal duplo; Bocal modular/substituível; Bocal simples; Outros